Texas statutes.
INSURANCE CODE

TITLE 8. HEALTH INSURANCE AND OTHER HEALTH COVERAGES

SUBTITLE A. HEALTH COVERAGE IN GENERAL

CHAPTER 1211. WAIVERS REGARDING CERTAIN FEDERAL HEALTH PLANS

Sec. 1211.001. WAIVER OF CERTAIN PROVISIONS FOR CERTAIN FEDERAL PLANS. If the commissioner of insurance, in consultation with the commissioner of health and human services, determines that a provision of Section 843.209 or 843.321, Subchapter J, Chapter 843, Chapter 1213, Subchapter C or C-1, Chapter 1301, or Section 1301.008, 1301.069, or 1301.162 will cause a negative fiscal impact on the state with respect to providing benefits or services under Subchapter XIX, Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Section 1396 et seq.), as amended, or Subchapter XXI, Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Section 1397aa et seq.), as amended, the commissioner of insurance by rule shall waive the application of that provision to the providing of those benefits or services.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 728 (H.B. 2018), Sec. 11.027(a), eff. September 1, 2005.